Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 14 Notaries Public
21-14-307. Physical proximity of signers of electronic documents required.

The electronic notary public shall not under any circumstances base identification merely upon familiarity with the electronic signature of the signer or an electronic verification process that authenticates the electronic signature of the signer when the signer is not in the physical presence of the electronic notary public.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 306, § 1.

21-14-308. Fees.

Reasonably established by the electronic notary public; and

Disclosed and agreed upon by the client and principal before the electronic notarial act occurs.

Upon conviction, he or she shall be fined in a sum not less than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

History.

Acts 2017, No. 306, § 1.